District of Columbia statutes.
11-905

Oath of judges.

Each judge of the Superior Court, when appointed shall take the oath prescribed for judges of courts of the United States.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 482, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-905.
1973 Ed., § 11-905.